Connecticut, session 2026, SB00048.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
two hundred fifty thousand dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used
by the Department of Education for the purpose of providing grants-in-
aid to schools for purchasing automatic external defibrillators.